Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-346
Commission; state parks; use by public; concessions; length of term; fees.

In its discretion, the commission may permit the use of state parks and recreation grounds, or any of them, by the public under such regulations as may be prescribed. It may, in like manner, grant concessions therein upon such rentals or fees and for such terms not exceeding twenty years, as it may deem advisable.

Laws 1929, c. 113, § 6, p. 445;

C.S.1929, § 81-6506;

Laws 1935, c. 174, § 4, p. 641;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-6506;

R.S.1943, § 81-812;

Laws 1961, c. 428, § 1, p. 1337;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 81-812;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 104.